New Jersey, session 222, A1727.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2007, c.92; P.L.2007, c.103; P.L.2008, c.89; P.L.2010, c.1; P.L.2010, c.3; P.L.2011, c.78; or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, all current, non-retired members of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund shall be entitled to and shall receive the same benefits received by members of the retirement system who enrolled in the system prior to July 1, 2007.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a member of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund who files an application for retirement after the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be entitled to and shall receive the same retirement benefits received by members of the retirement system who enrolled in the system prior to July 1, 2007. b.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, all employees of public employers who earn more than the minimum salary requirements but do not meet the minimum work hours eligibility requirements on the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c. (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), pursuant N.J.S.18A:66-1 et seq. shall be enrolled as members of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund in accordance with the provisions of subsection a. of this section.  The employer shall promptly process the compulsory enrollment of each affected employee no later than 60 days following the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c. (1) Employees who are enrolled as participants of the Defined Contribution Retirement Program established pursuant to P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et seq.) on the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be enrolled in the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section, unless they opt out pursuant to this subsection.  Upon enrollment, the employee shall receive an automatic transfer of all years of service credit from the Defined Contribution Retirement Program to the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund.  Any years of service credit transferred to the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund from the Defined Contribution Retirement Program pursuant to this subsection shall be used to qualify the member for deferred retirement, early retirement, service retirement, disability retirement, veterans retirement, health benefits enumerated under the School Employees Health Benefits Program, and other benefits as determined to be appropriate by the Division of Pensions and Benefits; provided, however, that any years of service credit transferred to the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund from the Defined Contribution Retirement Program pursuant to this subsection shall not be used to calculate the amount of the pension benefits the member would receive in retirement as set forth by N.J.S.18A:66-1 et seq.  A members prior contributions into the Defined Contribution Retirement Program shall not be transferred into the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund and shall remain in the programs fund. (2) Any employees enrolled as participants of the Defined Contribution Retirement Program and whose years of service credit are transferred to the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a notice of the automatic transfer of service credit no later than 60 days following the effective date of this act, P.L. , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (3) Any employees enrolled as participants of the Defined Contribution Retirement Program who do not wish to become enrolled as a member of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund pursuant to this subsection shall be permitted to opt out of joining the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund by providing a notice to their employer no later than six months of receiving the notice outlined in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  Any employees who opt out shall remain participants of the Defined Contribution Retirement Program. d.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any members of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund receiving long term disability insurance pursuant to section 10 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.18A:66-39.1), shall be considered eligible to apply for an ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-1 et seq. If the member elects to apply for disability retirement benefits under the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund the member shall do so no later than two calendar years following the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.  Any changes to the early retirement, deferred retirement, service retirement, and maximum base salary resulting from the provisions of this act shall only apply to members who begin processing a retirement application after the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.